Massachusetts, session 194th, H4057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 26 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, the city of
Haverhill may be authorized to increase the membership of the board of health from three (3)
members to five (5) members. Said members shall be appointed by the mayor with the approval
of the city council.
SECTION 2. During the month of January, annually following the effective date of this
act, the mayor shall appoint one member of the board of health for a term of three years to serve
from the first Monday of the following February. The mayor shall appoint a second member of
the board of health for a term of two years to serve from the First Monday of the following
February. Thereafter, as the terms of the board of health expire, successors shall be appointed for
terms of 3 years.
of 2

SECTION 3. That the general court may make clerical or editorial changes of form only
to the bill, unless the mayor approves amendments to the bill before enactment by the general
court and provided further that the mayor is hereby authorized to approve amendments which
shall be within the scope of the general public objectives of this petition.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2